Utah statutes.
17B-2a-402.   Provisions applicable to improvement districts.

(1)  Each improvement district is governed by and has the powers stated in:

(a)  this part; and

(b)  Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts.

(2)  This part applies only to improvement districts.

(3)  An improvement district is not subject to the provisions of any other part of this chapter.

(4)  If there is a conflict between a provision in Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts, and a provision in this part, the provision in this part governs.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

